Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB128.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 222.504 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet shall:
(a) Require certified recovery residences to provide proof of certification at least
annually;
(b) Require certified recovery residences to notify the cabinet of any change in
their certification status, including but not limited to a suspension or
revocation of certification by a certifying organization;
(c) Require separate proof of certification for each recovery residence owned or
operated by an individual or entity in the Commonwealth;
(d) Require recovery residences to be inspected no less than annually by state
or local officials capable of ensuring compliance with subsection (1)(a) of
Section 2 of this Act;
(e) Post on its website the name, telephone number, and location by local
jurisdiction of each certified recovery residence and shall update the list at
least quarterly;
(f)[(e)] Post on its website the name of each certifying organization approved by
the cabinet; and
(g)[(f)] Notify local governments with appropriate jurisdiction of receipt of
proof of certification from a recovery residence within thirty (30) days of
receipt of proof of certification.
(2) The cabinet shall not disclose the address of a recovery residence except to local
governments, local law enforcement, and emergency personnel.
(3) The cabinet may:
(a) In lieu of posting the information required by subsection (1)(e)[(d)] of this
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 7/14/2025 3:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 220
section to its website, post a link to another website that aggregates
information on certified recovery residences or other information providers;
and
(b) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
to carry out the provisions of this section and KRS 222.500, 222.502,
222.506, 222.508, and 222.510.
(4) If a recovery residence violates any provision of this section, KRS 222.502, or any
administrative regulation promulgated thereunder, the cabinet and local
governments are hereby granted the authority and legal standing necessary to
impose civil fines as permitted under subsection (5) of this section and to initiate
appropriate legal action to compel a recovery residence that is operating in violation
of KRS 222.502 to cease operating.
(5) (a) Any certified recovery residence or other person operating a recovery
residence who knowingly fails to submit any report, data, or other information
as may be required by the cabinet through the promulgation of an
administrative regulation or by a local government through the enactment of a
local ordinance or who submits fraudulent reports, data, or information may
be subject to civil fines established by the cabinet through the promulgation of
an administrative regulation or by a local government through the enactment
of a local ordinance.
(b) Any person or entity who knowingly establishes, maintains, or operates an
uncertified recovery residence in violation of KRS 222.502 may be subject to
civil fines established by the cabinet through the promulgation of an
administrative regulation or by a local government through the enactment of a
local ordinance.
(6) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a recovery residence that furnishes proof
of current certification from a certifying organization to a local government shall be
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 7/14/2025 3:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 220
presumed by the local government to be in compliance with this section and KRS
222.500, 222.502, 222.506, 222.508, and 222.510.
Section 2. KRS 222.506 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A recovery residence shall:
(a) Comply with all state and local zoning, building code, and fire safety laws,
administrative regulations, and ordinances;
(b) Clearly disclose the following by inclusion in any advertising and by posting
such a notice in a conspicuous location inside the residence:
1. Notice that the recovery residence is not a treatment facility;
2. A list of services offered by the recovery residence; and
3. If the recovery residence is exempt from certification pursuant to KRS
222.502(1)(b), notice that the recovery residence is exempt from
certification requirements;
(c)[(b)] Require residents to abstain from the use of alcohol, illicit drugs, and
other intoxicating substances;
(d)[(c)] Require residents to participate in recovery support services including
through a peer-to-peer supervision model; and
(e)[(d)] Allow individuals who are receiving medication for addiction treatment
to continue to receive such treatment while residing in the recovery residence
as directed by a licensed prescriber.
(2) A recovery residence shall not:[, ]
(a) Except as permitted under subsection (3) of this section, directly provide any
medical or clinical services including on-site medication administration; or
(b) Be occupied by or provide housing to more than the lesser of the following:
1. Two (2) residents per bedroom; or
2. One (1) resident per five hundred (500) square feet of living space.
(3) (a) The requirement that residents abstain from the use of intoxicating substances
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 7/14/2025 3:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 220
established in subsection (1)(c)[(b)] of this section shall not apply to any
legally prescribed medication when used by a resident as directed by a
licensed prescriber.
(b) Subsection (1)(e)[(d)] of this section shall not apply to any recovery residence
owned or operated by an entity that is exempted, in part or in whole, pursuant
to 42 U.S.C. sec. 3607 or 12187 from compliance with the Americans with
Disabilities Act, Pub. L. No. 101-336, or the Fair Housing Act, Pub. L. No.
100-430.
(c) The prohibition on the provision of on-site medical and clinical services
established in subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to:
1. The self-administration of prescribed medications by a resident as
directed by a licensed prescriber within his or her scope of practice;
2. Verification of abstinence from the use of alcohol, illicit drugs, and
other intoxicating substances; or
3. The provision of on-site medical and clinical services, including
telehealth services and other in-residence services, to an individual
residing in a recovery residence by a licensed medical or behavioral
health provider provided that:
a. The licensed provider is not employed or contracted by the
recovery residence unless at least one (1) of the following criteria
is met:
i. The recovery residence does not receive payment from the
licensed provider;
ii. The recovery residence makes on-site clinical services
available from an outside service provider, but each resident
may utilize the clinical service provider of his or her
choosing; or
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 7/14/2025 3:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 220
iii. The recovery residence is operated by or is a direct
subsidiary of the licensed provider and the services are
provided as part of a continuum of care that can be shown by
the recovery residence operator to include step-down
facilities with resident-driven length of stay or referral
thereof;
b. The recovery residence has not required or otherwise induced a
resident to receive services from a specific provider unless the
recovery residence is operated by or is a direct subsidiary of the
provider and the services are provided as part of a continuum of
care that can be shown by the recovery residence operator to
include step-down facilities with resident-driven length of stay or
referral thereof; and
c. The licensed provider and the recovery residence shall each, as
applicable, comply with 18 U.S.C. sec. 220, 42 U.S.C. sec. 1320a-
7b(b), and 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395nn and any amendments thereto.
Section 3. KRS 222.510 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a local government
may enact ordinances requiring an individual or entity seeking to establish a
recovery residence to provide notice to all property owners within one thousand
(1,000) feet of the property on which the individual or entity intends to operate a
recovery residence. Local ordinances requiring notification to neighboring
property owners as permitted under this subsection may require notification up to
six (6) months prior to the date on which the individual or entity intends to begin
operating a recovery residence.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, nothing in KRS 222.500 to
222.510 shall be interpreted or construed to alter, amend, or otherwise infringe
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 7/14/2025 3:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 220
upon a local government's authority to regulate the use of property through properly
enacted land use laws pursuant to KRS Chapter 100, rental property regulations, or
any other local government authority provided under the law.
Section 4. Whereas the proliferation of recovery residences in communities
across the Commonwealth poses a potential risk to the safety and welfare of countless
neighborhoods and may have a significant negative impact on property values in areas
with a heavy concentration of recovery residences, an emergency is declared to exist, and
this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise
becoming a law.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 7/14/2025 3:53 PM Jacketed